src/en/tokenizer.xfst
source all/allpref.xfst

define Caseinsensitive [
a (->) A,
b (->) B,
c (->) C,
d (->) D,
e (->) E,
f (->) F,
g (->) G,
h (->) H,
i (->) I,
j (->) J,
k (->) K,
l (->) L,
m (->) M,
n (->) N,
o (->) O,
p (->) P,
q (->) Q,
r (->) R,
s (->) S,
t (->) T,
u (->) U,
v (->) V,
w (->) W,
x (->) X,
y (->) Y,
z (->) Z,
ö (->) Ö,
ü (->) Ü,
ä (->) Ä,
è (->) È,
é (->) É,
ú (->) Ú,
á (->) Á,
â (->) Â,
ê (->) Ê,
î (->) Î,
ô (->) Ô,
û (->) Û,
ß (->) {SS}
];

! Foma complains when this reuses the above definition
define CapitalCaseinsensitive [
a (->) A,
b (->) B,
c (->) C,
d (->) D,
e (->) E,
f (->) F,
g (->) G,
h (->) H,
i (->) I,
j (->) J,
k (->) K,
l (->) L,
m (->) M,
n (->) N,
o (->) O,
p (->) P,
q (->) Q,
r (->) R,
s (->) S,
t (->) T,
u (->) U,
v (->) V,
w (->) W,
x (->) X,
y (->) Y,
z (->) Z,
ö (->) Ö,
ü (->) Ü,
ä (->) Ä,
è (->) È,
é (->) É,
ú (->) Ú,
á (->) Á,
â (->) Â,
ê (->) Ê,
î (->) Î,
ô (->) Ô,
û (->) Û,
ß (->) {SS}
|| .#. _ ];

define Letter [ [ AsciiLetter | ö | ü | ä | è | é | ú | á | â | ê | î | ô | û | ß ] .o. Caseinsensitive ];

define NotSmallCaps [? - a - b - c - d - e - f - g - h - i - j - k - l - m - n - o - p - q - r - s - t - u - v - w - x - y - z - ü - ö - ä - è - é - ú - á - â - ê - î - ô - û];

define Clitics [ Apos [[{ll}|d|{ve}|s|{re}|m|n|{em}] .o. Caseinsensitive] ] | [["n" Apos "t"] .o. Caseinsensitive ]];

define Word Char+ (Apos Char+)*;

define Plusampersand @txt"de/plusampersand.txt";
define Word [Plusampersand | Word] (Dash [Plusampersand | Word])*;

! Abbreviations and Initials
define Months [{Jan}|{Feb}|{Mar}|{Apr}|{Jun}|{Jul}|{Aug}|{Sep}(t)|{Oct}|{Nov}|{Dec}];
define Abbr [ [ @txt"en/abbrv.txt" | Letter | Months ] .o. CapitalCaseinsensitive ] %.;

source all/allpost.xfst

echo - Compile Real Token

define RealToken [Punct|Emdash|Abbr|Clitics|Word|SNS|AcronymDep|Ord|Num|Years|Times|XMLEntities|Omission];

! Treatmeant for I as a word in "M. I. Baxter was killed in World War I. So was I."
define NonAbbrI [ {am}|{was}|{will}|{have}|{had}|{would}|{do}|{did}|{and}|{War}|{than}|{not}|[P|p]{art} ];


echo - Introduce Token splitter

define Token [
  RealToken @-> ... NLout,
  XML @-> ... NLout,
  URL @-> ... NLout,
  Email @-> ... NLout,
  File @-> ... NLout,
  Domain @-> ... NLout,
  [Emoticons|Arrows] @-> ... NLout
]
! I as a separate token
.o. ["I" @-> ... NLout \/ NonAbbrI [WS | NLout ]+ _ ]
! Clitiqs are tokens
.o. [ 0 -> NLout \/ _ Clitics .#. ];

source all/allsentencesplit.xfst

! foma -e "source tokenizer.xfst" -q -s && cat text.txt | flookup tokenizer.fst -x -b
